Tennessee statutes. Title 62 Professions, Businesses and Trades
Chapter 25

Rental Location Agent Act of 1978

62-25-101. Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Rental Location Agent Act of 1978.”

Acts 1978, ch. 663, § 1; T.C.A., § 62-2501.

Cross-References. Liability of professional societies, title 62, ch. 50, part 1.

62-25-102. Chapter definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Person” means any natural person, corporation, partnership, firm or association; and

“Rental location agent” means any person who engages in or is employed in the business of locating, providing assistance in locating or furnishing information concerning the location or availability of real property, including apartment housing, that may be leased or rented as a private dwelling, abode or place of residence and who receives or solicits a fee or other valuable consideration from a prospective tenant.

Acts 1978, ch. 663, § 2; T.C.A., § 62-2502.

62-25-103. License requirements — Rules and regulations — Enforcement of chapter — Penalties.

It is unlawful for any person to engage in the business or capacity of a rental location agent in this state without first having obtained a license from the real estate commission. A license held by a real estate broker or real estate salesperson employed by a licensed real estate broker is deemed to satisfy the license requirements of this chapter.

The application for the license shall be filed in the office of the real estate commission on the forms and accompanied by the fee that the commission may prescribe. All licenses shall expire two (2) years from the date the license was issued or renewed.

In order to effectuate the purposes of this chapter, the commission shall have the power to promulgate all necessary rules and regulations.

The real estate commission may apply to a court of competent jurisdiction for an order enjoining any act or practice that constitutes a violation of this chapter.

Upon a finding by the court that there are reasonable grounds to believe that a person is engaging in any such act or practice or is about to engage in any such act or practice, an injunction, a restraining order or any other appropriate order shall be granted by the court, regardless of the existence of another remedy.

Any proceeding for relief pursuant to this section shall be in accordance with the Tennessee rules of civil procedure.

Every rental location agent shall secure a bond executed to the state of Tennessee by a surety company duly authorized to do business in this state.

The bond shall be in a form approved by the district attorney general and shall be for the use and benefit of any person who may be injured or aggrieved by the wrongful act or default of the rental location agent.

Any person so injured or aggrieved may bring an action in the person's own name on the bond without assignment thereof.

The bond required by subdivisions (e)(1) and (2) shall be in the amount of ten thousand dollars ($10,000); provided, that the bond may be in the amount of two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) for any rental location agent employed by a corporation, partnership, firm or association that is licensed under this chapter.

The bond shall be in full force and effect at all times and places in which the licensee acts as a rental location agent in this state.

Each bond secured pursuant to this subsection (e) shall be recorded in the office of the clerk of the county in which the licensee maintains an office or is employed. Until the bond is so recorded, the holder of the license shall not exercise any of the rights and privileges conferred in the license.

Any licensed real estate broker or affiliate broker who has obtained a bond in accordance with chapter 13 of this title need not secure an additional bond under this chapter; however, § 62-13-306 [repealed] shall apply with respect to any wrongful act or default of a broker or affiliate broker occurring in the broker's or affiliate broker's capacity as a rental location agent.

A violation of this section is a Class C misdemeanor.

Acts 1978, ch. 663, § 3; 1981, ch. 298, § 1; T.C.A., § 62-2503; Acts 1982, ch. 864, § 17; 1989, ch. 591, § 113; 2005, ch. 252, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 62-13-306, referred to in subdivision (e)(5), was repealed by Acts 1984, ch. 810, § 7, which act enacted § 62-13-208 concerning the real estate education and recovery account.

Cross-References. Director of division of regulatory boards to promulgate rules establishing renewal dates of licenses, certificates or permits, § 56-1-302.

Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

62-25-104. Contract or receipt requirement — Refund of fee.

Every rental location agent engaged in any of the activities described in § 62-25-102(2) shall give a prospective tenant a contract or receipt, and the contract or receipt shall include a recital that any amount in excess of ten dollars ($10.00) shall be repaid or refunded to the prospective tenant if the prospective tenant after bona fide effort does not obtain a rental through the listing furnished by the rental location agent.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, if the information concerning rentals furnished by the rental location agent is not current or accurate in regard to the type of rental desired, the full fee shall be repaid or refunded to the prospective tenant upon demand.

The contract or receipt furnished to the prospective tenant shall also conform to rules and regulations adopted by the real estate commission designed to effect disclosure of material information regarding the services to be provided to the prospective tenant.

Acts 1978, ch. 663, § 4; T.C.A., § 62-2504.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

Violation of this section is a Class C misdemeanor, § 62-25-105.

62-25-105. Penalties.

It is unlawful for any person to knowingly refer a prospective tenant to:

A nonexistent address;

Property that is not for lease or rent;

Property that does not meet the specifications of the prospective tenant;

Property that leases or rents for a different price from that quoted by the rental location agent;

Property that has already been leased or rented; or

Property listed without the consent of the landlord.

It is unlawful for any person acting as a rental location agent to advertise in any manner without including the person's name and the fact that the person is a rental location agent in the advertisement.

It is unlawful for any person acting as a rental location agent to solicit a listing from a landlord after receipt of written notice from the landlord requesting that no further solicitations be made.

A violation of subsection (a), (b) or (c) or § 62-25-104 is a Class C misdemeanor.

Acts 1978, ch. 663, § 5; T.C.A., § 62-2505; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

62-25-106. Award for damages, costs and attorney fees.

In a civil action, any successful prospective tenant shall be entitled to an award for damages, court costs and reasonable attorney fees.

Acts 1978, ch. 663, § 6; T.C.A., § 62-2506.

62-25-107. Investigation by real estate commission — Suspension or revocation of license.

The real estate commission, upon its own motion or upon a signed complaint made by any person in writing, may investigate the activities of any rental location agent in this state or any person who acts in that capacity.

The commission may suspend, revoke or refuse to issue or renew a rental location agent's license on any of the following grounds:

Proof of financial irresponsibility or insolvency;

Making any materially false or misleading statement or omission in an application for a license;

Conviction of or a plea of nolo contendere to a felony or misdemeanor, if the commission finds that the conviction or plea renders the applicant or licensee insufficiently trustworthy to deal with the public. However, an action taken under this subdivision (b)(3) shall be subject to the applicable provisions of the Fresh Start Act that are compiled in chapter 76, part 1 of this title; or

Any violation of this chapter or of any rule duly adopted by the commission under this chapter.

The license of any real estate broker or affiliate broker who acts as a rental location agent may be suspended or revoked on any of the grounds stated in subsection (b).

Acts 1978, ch. 663, § 7; 1981, ch. 298, §§ 2, 3; T.C.A., § 62-2507; Acts 2018, ch. 745, § 13.

62-25-108. Service of process.

If a rental location agent cannot with reasonable diligence be found at the last known place of business as reflected by the real estate commission records, the real estate commission shall be an agent of the rental location agent upon whom any process, notice or demand may be served.

Service on the commission of any process, notice or demand shall be made in the same manner provided for service on the secretary of state pursuant to § 20-2-205.

The commission shall keep a record of all processes, notices and demands served upon it under this section and shall record the time of the service and its action with reference to the service.

Nothing in this section limits or affects the right to serve any process, notice or demand required or permitted by law to be served upon a rental location agent in any other manner now or hereafter permitted by law or by applicable rules of procedure.

Acts 1978, ch. 663, § 8; T.C.A., § 62-2508.